test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.ana.yaml
  Noun - apmilbealjuogus: # FirstComponent + MALISLONG 
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuogus
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Gen: apmilbealjuhkosa
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Acc: apmilbealjuhkosa
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Loc: apmilbealjuhkosis
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Ill: apmilbealjuhkosii
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Com: apmilbealjuhkosiin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosat
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Gen: apmilbealjuhkosiid
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Acc: apmilbealjuhkosiid
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Loc: apmilbealjuhkosiin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Ill: apmilbealjuhkosiidda
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Com: apmilbealjuhkosiiguin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Ess: apmilbealjuogusin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosaš
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosaččaš
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuogusheapme
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuoguslaš
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juogus
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Gen: apmilbeal-juhkosa
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Acc: apmilbeal-juhkosa
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Loc: apmilbeal-juhkosis
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Ill: apmilbeal-juhkosii
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Com: apmilbeal-juhkosiin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosat
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Gen: apmilbeal-juhkosiid
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Acc: apmilbeal-juhkosiid
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Loc: apmilbeal-juhkosiin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Ill: apmilbeal-juhkosiidda
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Com: apmilbeal-juhkosiiguin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Ess: apmilbeal-juogusin
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosaš
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosaččaš
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juogusheapme
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juoguslaš


  Noun - beanalihtti: # BEANA SgNomCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beanalihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beanalihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beanalihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beanalihtáš
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beana-lihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beana-lihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beana-lihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beana-lihtáš

  Noun - beatnatlihtti: # BEANA SgGenCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnatlihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnatlihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnatlihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnatlihtáš
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnat-lihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnat-lihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnat-lihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnat-lihtáš

  Noun - beatnagiidlihtti: # BEANA PlGenCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiidlihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnagiidlihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnagiidlihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiidlihtáš
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiid-lihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnagiid-lihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnagiid-lihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiid-lihtáš

  Noun -duovddadilli: # SEAMU SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovddadilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovddadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovddadilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovddadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovddadilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovddadillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovddadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovddadilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovddadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovddadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovddadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovddadiliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovddadiliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovddadillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovddadiláš
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdda-dilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdda-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdda-dilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdda-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdda-dilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdda-dillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdda-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdda-dilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdda-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdda-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdda-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdda-diliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdda-diliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdda-dillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdda-diláš

  Noun - duovdagadilli: # SEAMU SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagadilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdagadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdagadilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdagadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdagadilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdagadillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdagadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdagadilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdagadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdagadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdagadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdagadiliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdagadiliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdagadillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagadiláš
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdaga-dilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdaga-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdaga-dilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdaga-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdaga-dilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdaga-dillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdaga-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdaga-dilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdaga-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdaga-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdaga-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdaga-diliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdaga-diliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdaga-dillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdaga-diláš

  Noun - duovdagiiddilli: # SEAMU PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiiddilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdagiiddili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdagiiddilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdagiiddili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdagiiddilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdagiiddillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdagiiddiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdagiiddilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdagiiddiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdagiiddiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdagiiddiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdagiiddiliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdagiiddiliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdagiiddillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiiddiláš
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiid-dilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdagiid-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdagiid-dilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdagiid-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdagiid-dilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdagiid-dillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdagiid-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdagiid-dilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdagiid-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdagiid-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdagiid-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdagiid-diliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdagiid-diliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdagiid-dillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiid-diláš

  Noun - olmmošjuolgi: # FALIS SgNomCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olmmošjuolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olmmošjuolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olmmošjuolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olmmošjuolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olmmošjuolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olmmošjuolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olmmošjuolggálaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olmmoš-juolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olmmoš-juolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olmmoš-juolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olmmoš-juolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olmmoš-juolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olmmoš-juolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olmmoš-juolggálaš
